Hawaii statutes.
§226-11 Objectives and policies for the
physical environment--land-based, shoreline, and marine resources. (a)
Planning for the State's physical environment with regard to land-based,
shoreline, and marine resources shall be directed towards achievement of the
following objectives:

(1) Prudent use of Hawaii's land-based, shoreline,
and marine resources.

(2) Effective protection of Hawaii's unique and
fragile environmental resources.

(b) To achieve the land-based, shoreline, and
marine resources objectives, it shall be the policy of this State to:

(1) Exercise an overall conservation ethic in the use
of Hawaii's natural resources.

(2) Ensure compatibility between land-based and
water-based activities and natural resources and ecological systems.

(3) Take into account the physical attributes of
areas when planning and designing activities and facilities.

(4) Manage natural resources and environs to
encourage their beneficial and multiple use without generating costly or
irreparable environmental damage.

(5) Consider multiple uses in watershed areas,
provided such uses do not detrimentally affect water quality and recharge
functions.

(6) Encourage the protection of rare or endangered
plant and animal species and habitats native to Hawaii.

(7) Provide public incentives that encourage private
actions to protect significant natural resources from degradation or
unnecessary depletion.

(8) Pursue compatible relationships among activities,
facilities, and natural resources.

(9) Promote increased accessibility and prudent use
of inland and shoreline areas for public recreational, educational, and
scientific purposes. [L 1978, c 100, pt of §2; am L 1986, c 276, §10]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next